Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202548-1115
Notice of employment; preference or discrimination; race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, military or veteran status; unlawful; exception.

Except as provided in section 48-1127 and except for the veterans preference provided for in sections 48-225 to 48-231 or section 48-238, it shall be an unlawful employment practice for an employer, labor organization, or employment agency to print or publish or cause to be printed or published any notice or advertisement relating to employment by such an employer or membership in or any classification or referral for employment by such a labor organization, or relating to any classification or referral for employment by such an employment agency, indicating any preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based on race, color, religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status, except that such a notice or advertisement may indicate a preference, limitation, specification, or discrimination based on religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status when religion, sex, disability, marital status, national origin, or military or veteran status is a bona fide occupational qualification for employment.

Laws 1965, c. 276, § 15, p. 789;

Laws 1973, LB 266, § 10;

Laws 1977, LB 161, § 9;

Laws 2025, LB150, § 86.